Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 1 General Provisions

4-8-1.
Minimum standards for control of dogs.

It is the intention of this chapter to establish as state law minimum standards for the control and regulation of dogs and to establish state crimes for violations of such minimum standards. However, this chapter shall not prohibit local governments from adopting and enforcing ordinances or resolutions which provide for more restrictive control and regulation of dogs than the minimum standards provided for in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 1/HB 685.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012. See the editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 1/HB 685, effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 4-8-1 as present Code Section 4-8-1.1.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 6/HB 685, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall apply to proceedings for the classification and registration of dogs which are pending on July 1, 2012, as well as to such proceedings which arise on or after July 1, 2012.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-1.1.
Abandonment of dead dogs — Upon private property.

No person shall intentionally abandon a dead dog on any private property belonging to another unless the person so doing shall have first obtained permission from the owner of the property on which the dog is being left and the provisions of Code Section 4-5-3 are complied with in full.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 831, § 1; Code 1981, §

4-8-1

; Code 1981, §

4-8-1

.1, redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 1/HB 685.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 4-8-1 as present Code Section 4-8-1.1.

Cross references.

Solid waste management, §

12-8-20

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 6/HB 685, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Code section shall apply to proceedings for the classification and registration of dogs which are pending on July 1, 2012, as well as to such proceedings which arise on or after July 1, 2012.

4-8-1.2.
Classification of certain dogs as hunting dogs.

Any domestic dog that is registered with the American Kennel Club or United Kennel Club as a sporting breed group dog, hound breed group dog, or nonsporting breed group dog or that is of a breed used in the lawful pursuit of hunting in this state pursuant to Title 27, that is used during an established hunting season to aid an individual to pursue or hunt wildlife, and whose owner or other member of the household has a hunting permit from the Department of Natural Resources shall be classified as a hunting dog, and the owner of any such dog shall receive the same registration, licensing, or permitting fee from any local government as is available to owners of dogs which have been spayed or neutered. Nothing in this Code section shall affect the ability of local governments to deal with vicious dogs, abandoned dogs, or stray dogs.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-1.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 238, § 1/SB 184.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

4-8-2.
Abandonment of dead dogs — Upon public property or public right of way.

No person shall abandon a dead dog on any public property or public right of way unless the place in which the dog is being left is a public dump or other facility designed for receiving such and has been designated by the local governmental authorities as a public facility for receiving trash or refuse and the provisions of Code Section 4-5-3 are complied with in full.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 831, § 2.

4-8-3.
Abandonment of dogs.

No person shall release a dog on any property, public or private, with the intention of abandoning the dog.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 831, § 3.

4-8-4.
Liability of owner or custodian for damages done to livestock, poultry, or pet animal by dog.

The owner or, if no owner can be found, the custodian exercising care and control over any dog which while off the owner’s or custodian’s property causes injury, death, or damage directly or indirectly to any livestock, poultry, or pet animal shall be civilly liable to the owner of the livestock, poultry, or pet animal for injury, death, or damage caused by the dog. The owner or, if no owner can be found, the custodian exercising care and control over any dog shall be liable for any damage caused by such dog to public or private property. The liability of the owner or custodian of the dog shall include consequential damages.

This Code section is to be considered cumulative of other remedies provided by law. There is no intent to eliminate or limit other causes of action which might inure to the owner of any livestock, poultry, or pet animal.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 831, § 4; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 2/HB 685.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “while off the owner’s or custodian’s property” for “goes upon the land of another and”, substituted “livestock, poultry, or pet animal” for “livestock or poultry”, and substituted “livestock, poultry, or pet animal for injury, death, or damage” for “livestock or poultry for damages, death, or injury” near the end, and added the second sentence; and, in the second sentence of subsection (b), substituted “eliminate” for “do away with” and substituted “livestock, poultry, or pet animal” for “livestock or poultry” at the end. See the editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding liability of owner of dog which kills or injures livestock, § 51-2-6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 6/HB 685, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to proceedings for the classification and registration of dogs which are pending on July 1, 2012, as well as to such proceedings which arise on or after July 1, 2012.

Law reviews.

For survey of developments in Georgia torts law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 247 (1981).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-5.
Cruelty to dogs; authorized killing of dogs.

No person shall perform a cruel act on any dog; nor shall any person harm, maim, or kill any dog, or attempt to do so, except that a person may:

Defend his or her person or property, or the person or property of another, from injury or damage being caused by a dog; or

Kill any dog causing injury or damage to any livestock, poultry, or pet animal.

The method used for killing the dog shall be designed to be as humane as is possible under the circumstances. A person who humanely kills a dog under the circumstances indicated in subsection (a) of this Code section shall incur no liability for such death.

This Code section shall not be construed to limit in any way the authority or duty of any law enforcement officer, dog or rabies control officer, humane society, or veterinarian.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 831, § 5; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 3/HB 685.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “or her” in paragraph (a)(1) and substituted “livestock, poultry, or pet animal” for “livestock or poultry” in paragraph (a)(2). See the editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Destroying or injuring police dog, §

16-11-107

.

Cruelty to animals generally, §

16-12-4

.

Duty of conservation rangers to kill dogs pursuing or killing deer, §

27-3-49

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 6/HB 685, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to proceedings for the classification and registration of dogs which are pending on July 1, 2012, as well as to such proceedings which arise on or after July 1, 2012.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-6.
Permitting dogs in heat to roam or run free.

No owner or custodian of any dog in heat shall permit the dog to roam or run free beyond the limits of his property.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 831, § 6.

4-8-6.1.
Removal of certain collars from dogs; restitution; exemption.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “collar” means any electronic or radio transmitting collar that has the purpose of tracking the location of a dog.

No person shall remove a collar from a dog without permission from the dog’s owner with the intention of preventing or hindering the owner from locating such dog, and if such dog is lost or killed as a result of the violator’s removal of such collar, the violator shall be required to pay the dog’s owner restitution in the amount of the actual value of the dog and any associated veterinary expenses.

This Code section shall not apply to an owner or lessee of real property who removes a collar from a dog caught on his or her owned or leased property while such dog remains on such property if such owner or lessee gives notice of such action within 24 hours to the county or municipal law enforcement agency having territorial jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 489, § 1/SB 16.

4-8-7.
Penalty for violations of article.

Except as provided in Code Sections 16-12-4 and 16-12-37, any person who violates any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 831, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 824, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Animal Protection Act of 2000.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 12 (2000).